Hawaii statutes.
§440-17 Admission tickets. All tickets
of admission to any boxing contest for which admission fees are charged and
received shall have printed clearly upon the face thereof the purchase price of
same, and no ticket shall be sold for more than the price as printed thereon.
[L 1929, c 216, §20; RL 1935, §7007; RL 1945, §7568; RL 1955, §165-19; HRS
§440-17; am L 1983, c 241, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next